Mississippi, session 2026, HB1366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-9-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-9-57.  (1) * * *If any Any person * * *for any reason whatsoever, who shall practice, attempt, or offer to practice * * *dentistry or dental hygiene illegally without a license within the meaning of this chapter, * * * he or she shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or be imprisoned in the county jail not less than two (2) months nor more than six (6) months. (2)  Any person who shall practice, attempt, or offer to practice dentistry illegally without a license within the meaning of this chapter shall be guilty of the crime of "practicing dentistry without a license", and upon conviction, he or she shall be guilty of a felony, and: (a)  For the first violation, the person shall be fined not less than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00), nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections not less than one (1) year, nor more than three (3) years, or both. (b)  For any second or subsequent violation, the person shall be fined not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), imprisoned in the custody of the Department of Corrections not less than three (3) years, nor more than ten (10) years, or both. (c)  For any violation of this section, the court may, in addition to the fines described in this subsection, require reimbursement of any costs suffered by the victim related to repair or damage caused as a result of the illegal practice of dental hygiene or dentistry. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.